Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-310 Dormant accounts. (a) If
there has been no activity on a share or deposit account for one year, the
credit union may impose a reasonable maintenance fee.

(b) Share and deposit accounts, dividends,
interest and other sums due or standing in the name of a member or other person
and held by the credit union are presumed abandoned unless the member or other
person has, within five years:

(1) Increased or decreased the amount of the funds or
presented an appropriate record for the crediting of dividends or interest;

(2) Corresponded in writing with the credit union
concerning the funds; or

(3) Otherwise indicated an interest in the funds as
evidenced by a memorandum on file with the credit union. [L 1993, c 350, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next